Florida, session 2026, HB4015.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (12) of section 8 of section 3 of
chapter 2001-336, Laws of Florida, as amended, is amended to
read:
Section 8. Powers given the Board to effect a surface
water management system within District boundaries.—In order to
responsibly, efficiently, and effectively secure, operate, and
maintain an adequate, dependable surface water management
system, the Board of Directors, consistent with and supportive
of the state water policy, the state water use plan, the state
land development plan, and the regional policy plan, shall:
(12)(a) Levy, assess, and collect an annual stormwater
management user fee to carry out the purposes of the District,
beginning with the 1990-1991 budget year.
(a) Such fee must be just and equitable and shall be based
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4015-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 4015 2026
upon the impact that a given parcel of land imposes on the
stormwater management system.
(b) A fee may not be finally set by the Board of Directors
or approved by the Board of County Commissioners of Brevard
County during its annual budget review until after a public
hearing is held by the Board of County Commissioners. The Board
of County Commissioners must hold a special public hearing
within the boundaries of the District. At the public hearing,
all owners of property in the District shall have an opportunity
to be heard concerning the proposed fee.
(c) Notice of such public hearing for the 1990-1991 budget
year must be given in the manner prescribed in subsection (2) of
Section 16. Thereafter, notice must be given by publication in a
newspaper of general circulation in Brevard County at least 7
days before the date of the hearing. The stormwater management
user fee, when established, shall be deemed to be reasonable and
necessary to carry out the obligations, responsibilities, and
duties of the District. All of the proceeds of the fee are in
payment for the use of the District stormwater management
system. The fee must be established by resolution of the Board
of Directors and approved by a majority vote of the Board of
County Commissioners of Brevard County, with each County
Commissioner whose county commission residency area lies wholly
or partially within the District voting in the affirmative.
(d) The stormwater management user fee structure shall
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4015-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 4015 2026
have three land classifications: Residential, Agricultural, and
Commercial. The Board of Directors, in establishing the annual
fee, must use the Brevard County Land Use Code Index as the
basis for land classification. The annual stormwater management
user fee shall be levied on the parcels, as the Brevard County
Land Use Code Index has them designated, for that respective
budget year.

For the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the Board of County Commissioners
of Brevard County approved for the district to collect
stormwater management fees per acre or portion thereof for
residential parcels at a rate of $25, agricultural parcels at a
rate of $8.50, and commercial parcels at a rate of $52.50.

Beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the stormwater
management fee for residential parcels, agricultural parcels, or
commercial parcels shall be adjusted annually by the average of
the monthly consumer price index figures for the stated 12-month
period, relative to the South Region of the United States,
issued by the United States Department of Labor. For the 2026-
2027 fiscal year, the consumer price index adjustment affecting
the stormwater management fee shall be based on the fee approved
by the Brevard County Commission in the 2025-2026 fiscal year.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, the stormwater management fee may
not be more than 10 percent above the fee for the preceding year
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4015-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 4015 2026
not inclusive of the aforementioned annual consumer price index
adjustment.

For the 1990-1991 budget year, the residential fee may not
exceed $10 per acre or portion thereof, the agricultural fee may
not exceed $3.50 per acre or portion thereof, and the commercial
fee may not exceed $21 per acre or portion thereof.

Thereafter, the stormwater management fee for residential
parcels, agricultural parcels, or commercial parcels may not be
more than 10 percent above the fee for the preceding year.
However, the maximum fee per acre or portion thereof for
residential parcels may not exceed $25, the maximum fee per acre
or portion thereof for agricultural parcels may not exceed
$8.50, and the maximum fee per acre or portion thereof for
commercial parcels may exceed $52.50.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4015-00